Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.205

Annexation/incorporation of fire protection district—Distribution of assets of district when less than five percent of district annexed—Distribution agreement—Arbitration.

(1) A distribution of assets from the fire protection district to the city or town shall occur as provided in this section upon the annexation or, in the case of an incorporation, on the date on which the city or town withdraws from the fire protection district pursuant to RCW 52.04.161, of an area by the city or town that constitutes less than five percent of the area of the fire protection district upon the adoption of a resolution by the city or town finding that the annexation or incorporation will impose a significant increase in the fire suppression responsibilities of the city or town with a corresponding reduction in fire suppression responsibilities by the fire protection district. Such a resolution must be adopted within sixty days of the effective date of the annexation, or within sixty days of the official date of incorporation of the city. If the fire protection district does not concur in the finding within sixty days of when a copy of the resolution is submitted to the board of commissioners, arbitration shall proceed under subsection (3) of this section over this issue.

(2) An agreement on the distribution of assets from the fire protection district to the city or town shall be entered into by the city or town and the fire protection district within ninety days of the concurrence by the fire protection district under subsection (1) of this section, or within ninety days of a decision by the arbitrators under subsection (3) of this section that a significant increase in the fire protection responsibilities will be imposed upon the city or town as a result of the incorporation or annexation. A distribution shall be based upon the extent of the increased fire suppression responsibilities with a corresponding reduction in fire suppression responsibilities by the fire protection district, and shall consider the impact of any debt obligation that may exist on the property that is so annexed or incorporated. If an agreement is not entered into after this ninety-day period, arbitration shall proceed under subsection (3) of this section concerning this issue unless both parties have agreed to an extension of this period.

(3) Arbitration shall proceed under this subsection over the issue of whether a significant increase in the fire protection responsibilities will be imposed upon the city or town as a result of the annexation or incorporation with a corresponding reduction in fire suppression responsibilities by the fire protection district, or over the distribution of assets from the fire protection district to the city or town if such a significant increase in fire protection responsibilities will be imposed. A board of arbitrators shall be established for an arbitration that is required under this section. The board of arbitrators shall consist of three persons, one of whom is appointed by the city or town within sixty days of the date when arbitration is required, one of whom is appointed by the fire protection district within sixty days of the date when arbitration is required, and one of whom is appointed by agreement of the other two arbitrators within thirty days of the appointment of the last of these other two arbitrators who is so appointed. If the two are unable to agree on the appointment of the third arbitrator within this thirty-day period, then the third arbitrator shall be appointed by a judge in the superior court of the county within which all or the greatest portion of the area that was so annexed or incorporated lies. The determination by the board of arbitrators shall be binding on both the city or town and the fire protection district.

[ 1993 c 262 s 4; 1989 c 267 s 3.]